Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1069
Service of order; return.

Where the injunction is allowed during litigation and without notice of the application therefor, the order of injunction shall be issued, and the sheriff shall forthwith serve the same upon each party enjoined, in the manner prescribed for serving a summons, and make return thereof without delay.

R.S.1867, Code § 257, p. 436;

R.S.1913, § 7798;

C.S.1922, § 8742;

C.S.1929, § 20-1069;

R.S.1943, § 25-1069.